Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 5. Enforcement; Remedies.

Sec. 39.52.410.
Violations; penalties for misconduct.

If the personnel board determines that a public employee has violated this chapter, it

shall order the employee to stop engaging in any official action related to the violation;

may order divestiture, establishment of a blind trust, restitution, or forfeiture; and

may recommend that the employee’s agency take disciplinary action, including dismissal.

If the personnel board determines that a nonsalaried member of a board or commission has violated this chapter, it (1) shall order the member to refrain from voting, deliberating, or participating in the matter; (2) may order restitution; and (3) may recommend to the appropriate appointing authority that the member be removed from the board or commission. A violation of this chapter is grounds for removal of a board or commission member for cause. If the personnel board recommends that a board or commission member be removed from office, the appointing authority shall immediately act to remove the member from office.

If the personnel board determines that a former public officer has violated this chapter, it shall

issue a public statement of its findings, conclusions, and recommendation; and

request the attorney general to exercise all legal and equitable remedies available to the state to seek whatever relief is appropriate.

If the personnel board finds a violation of this chapter by a public officer removable from office only by impeachment, it shall file a report with the president of the Senate, with its finding. The report must contain a statement of the facts alleged to constitute the violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.420.
Disciplinary action for violation.

In addition to any other cause an agency may have to discipline a public employee, an agency may reprimand, demote, suspend, discharge, or otherwise subject an employee to agency disciplinary action commensurate with the violations of this chapter. This section does not prohibit the review of a disciplinary action in the manner prescribed by an applicable collective bargaining agreement or personnel statute or rule.

An agency may initiate appropriate disciplinary action in the absence of an accusation under this chapter or during the pendency of a hearing or personnel board action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.430.
Actions voidable.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a state grant, contract, or lease entered into in violation of this chapter is voidable by the state. In a determination under this section of whether to void a grant, contract, or lease, the interests of third parties who could be damaged may be taken into account. The attorney general shall give notice of intent to void a state grant, contract, or lease under this section no later than 30 days after the personnel board’s determination of a violation under this chapter.

In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, the state may require a state loan received in violation of this chapter to become immediately payable.

Any state action taken in violation of this chapter is voidable, except that the interests of third parties and the nature of the violation may be taken into account. The attorney general may pursue any other available legal and equitable remedies.

The attorney general may recover any fee, compensation, gift, or benefit received by a person as a result of a violation of this chapter by a current or former public officer. Action to recover under this subsection must be brought within two years after discovery of the violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Sec. 39.52.440.
Civil penalties.

The personnel board may impose on a current or former public officer civil penalties not to exceed $5,000 for a violation of this chapter.
A penalty imposed under this section is in addition to and not instead of any other penalty that may be imposed according to law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For executive branch code of ethics, see 9 AAC 52.

Sec. 39.52.450.
Payment of twice the financial benefit.

The personnel board may, in addition to the civil penalties described in this chapter, require a current or former public officer who has financially benefited a person in violation of this chapter to pay to the state up to twice the amount that the person realized from the violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Sec. 39.52.460.
Criminal sanctions additional.

To the extent that violations under this chapter are punishable in a criminal action, that sanction is in addition to the civil remedies set out in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 87 SLA 1986)